Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1737XC (5) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.3D Prior authorization for 1 dental care services. 2 1. Definitions. As used in this section unless the context 3 otherwise provides: 4 a. âCommissionerâ means the commissioner of insurance. 5 b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 6 514C.3C. 7 c. âDental care providerâ means the same as defined in 8 section 514C.3C. 9 d. âDental care service planâ means the same as defined in 10 section 514C.3C. 11 e. âDental care servicesâ means the same as defined in 12 section 514C.3C. 13 f. âDental carrierâ means the same as defined in section 14 514C.3C. 15 g. âPrior authorizationâ means a determination by a dental 16 carrier in response to a request submitted by a dental care 17 provider as to whether a specific dental care service proposed 18 by the dental care provider for a covered person will be 19 reimbursed at a specified amount, subject to any applicable 20 coinsurance or deductible required under the covered personâs 21 dental care service plan. 22 2. Prior authorization. 23 a. A dental carrier shall not deny a claim submitted by a 24 dental care provider for dental care services approved by prior 25 authorization. 26 b. A dental carrier shall reimburse a dental care provider 27 at the contracted reimbursement rate for a dental care service 28 provided by the dental care provider to a covered person per 29 a prior authorization. 30 3. Exceptions. Subsection 2 shall not apply if any of the 31 following apply for each dental care service for which a dental 32 care provider is denied reimbursement: 33 a. On the date that the dental care service was provided 34 by the dental care provider to the covered person per a 35 -1- LSB 1737XC (5) 91 nls/ko 1/ 7 S.F. _____ prior authorization, a benefit limitation including but not 1 limited to an annual maximum or a frequency limitation that 2 was not applicable at the time of the prior authorization had 3 been reached due to utilization of the dental care service 4 plan subsequent to the dental carrier issuing the prior 5 authorization. 6 b. The dental care provider submits a claim for dental care 7 services approved by prior authorization and the documentation 8 of dental care services fails to support the claim for 9 dental care services as originally authorized by the prior 10 authorization. 11 c. Subsequent to the issuance of a prior authorization, and 12 prior to the provision of dental care services authorized by 13 the prior authorization, a covered person receives additional 14 dental care services, or a change in the dental condition of 15 the covered person occurs, such that the dental care services 16 authorized by the prior authorization are no longer considered 17 medically necessary based on the prevailing standard of care. 18 d. Subsequent to the issuance of a prior authorization, and 19 prior to the provision of dental care services authorized by 20 the prior authorization, a covered person receives additional 21 dental care services, or a change in the dental condition 22 of the covered person occurs, such that on the date that 23 the dental care service is to be provided a request for 24 prior authorization of the dental care service would require 25 disapproval pursuant to the terms and conditions for coverage 26 under the covered personâs current dental care service plan. 27 e. A payor other than the dental carrier is responsible for 28 payment for the dental care service. 29 f. A dental care provider has already received payment from 30 the dental carrier for the dental care services identified in 31 the claim for reimbursement. 32 g. The claim was submitted fraudulently to the dental 33 carrier. 34 h. The dental care provider, covered person, or other 35 -2- LSB 1737XC (5) 91 nls/ko 2/ 7 S.F. _____ person not related to the dental carrier provided inaccurate 1 information that the dental carrier relied on, in whole 2 or in part, for the dental carrierâs prior authorization 3 determination. 4 i. On the date that the dental care service was provided by 5 the dental care provider to the covered person per the prior 6 authorization, the covered person was ineligible to receive the 7 dental care service and the dental carrier did not know, and 8 with the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of 9 the covered personâs ineligibility. 10 4. Waiver prohibited. The requirements of this section 11 shall not be waived by contract. Any contractual arrangement 12 contrary to this section shall be null and void. 13 5. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 14 chapter 17A to administer this section. 15 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514C.3E State-regulated dental care 16 service plans. 17 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 18 provides: 19 a. âCommissionerâ means the commissioner of insurance. 20 b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 21 514C.3C. 22 c. âDental care providerâ means the same as defined in 23 section 514C.3C. 24 d. âDental care service planâ means the same as defined in 25 section 514C.3C. 26 e. âDental carrierâ means the same as defined in section 27 514C.3C. 28 2. If a covered personâs dental care service plan is subject 29 to the insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject 30 to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, a dental carrier shall 31 do all of the following: 32 a. Disclose to a dental care provider through an online 33 dental care provider portal, or other easily accessible 34 means, that a covered personâs dental care service plan is 35 -3- LSB 1737XC (5) 91 nls/ko 3/ 7 S.F. _____ state-regulated. 1 b. Include the statement âstate-regulatedâ on an electronic 2 or physical identification card issued to a covered person on 3 or after July 1, 2025. 4 3. Waiver prohibited. The requirements of this section 5 shall not be waived by contract. Any contract contrary to this 6 section shall be null and void. 7 4. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 8 chapter 17A to administer this section. 9 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 514C.3F Dental carrier ââ recovery of 10 claim overpayment. 11 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 12 otherwise provides: 13 a. âDental care providerâ means the same as defined in 14 section 514C.3C. 15 b. âDental care servicesâ means the same as defined in 16 section 514C.3C. 17 c. âDental carrierâ means the same as defined in section 18 514C.3C. 19 d. âOverpaymentâ means a payment made in error by a dental 20 carrier to a dental provider for a dental care service. 21 2. Appeals. A dental carrier shall establish written 22 policies and procedures for a dental care provider to appeal 23 an overpayment recovery or overpayment recovery request made 24 by the dental carrier. The dental carrier shall notify the 25 dental care provider of the policies and procedures to appeal 26 an overpayment recovery or overpayment recovery request at the 27 time that the dental carrier makes the overpayment recovery or 28 overpayment recovery request. The policies and procedures must 29 allow a dental care provider to appeal an overpayment recovery 30 or overpayment recovery request within a minimum of ninety 31 calendar days after the dental care provider receives such 32 notice. The policies and procedures must allow the dental care 33 provider to access the claim information that is the subject of 34 the overpayment dispute. 35 -4- LSB 1737XC (5) 91 nls/ko 4/ 7 S.F. _____ 3. Notice. A dental carrier shall not attempt to recover 1 an overpayment, in whole or in part, unless the dental carrier 2 provides written notice of the overpayment to the dental care 3 provider no later than three hundred sixty-five calendar 4 days after the date the dental care provider received the 5 overpayment. The written notice of overpayment must identify 6 the error made in the processing or payment of the claim. 7 The written notice must state a request for recovery of the 8 overpayment or notify the dental care provider of withholding 9 or reducing a payment as required in subsection 4. 10 4. Withholding or reducing payments. A dental carrier may 11 attempt to recover an overpayment by withholding or reducing a 12 payment to a dental care provider for a different claim if the 13 dental carrier provides the dental care provider with written 14 notice within one calendar day after the date of withholding 15 or reducing the payment for the other claim. The notice must 16 identify the original claim that was overpaid, the claim being 17 withheld or reduced, and the amount being withheld or reduced 18 for the overpayment and recovery. A dental carrier may include 19 the notice required by this subsection as part of the notice 20 required by subsection 3. 21 5. Applicability. Subsection 3 shall not apply, and a 22 dental carrier shall be entitled to recover an overpayment, 23 if the overpayment recovery efforts are based on a reasonable 24 belief of fraud, abuse, or other intentional misconduct. 25 6. Waiver prohibited. The requirements of this section 26 shall not be waived by contract. Any contract contrary to this 27 section shall be null and void. 28 7. Rules. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules 29 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 30